Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-111
Consumer, defined.

Consumer means a person receiving health or health-related services or environmental services and includes a patient, client, resident, customer, or person with a similar designation.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 11.